Hawaii statutes.
PART II.
GRAND JURY COUNSEL AND PROCEEDINGS

Revision Note

Part heading added pursuant to §23G-15.

§612-51 Grand jury counsel; appointment and
removal. The chief justice of the state supreme court shall appoint one or
more grand jury counsel for the four judicial circuits of the State, without
regard to chapters 76 and 89. Right to removal shall rest with the chief
justice. [L 1980, c 209, §2; am L 2002, c 148, §45]

Previous
Vol13_Ch0601-0676
Next